Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202648-4006
Rules and regulations.

The department may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry out the Nebraska Worker Adjustment and Retraining Notification Act.

Laws 2026, LB921, § 6.
July 18, 2026